Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-404
Legislative Council; executive board; special committees; civil or criminal actions; exempt; when.

The executive board shall have power and authority to appoint committees of the Legislative Council and assign subjects to them for study and reports. No member of the Legislature shall be liable in any civil or criminal action whatever for words spoken at an authorized committee meeting when conducting an investigation authorized by the executive board or for words spoken at meetings of standing or special committees of the Legislature.

Laws 1937, c. 118, § 2, p. 422;

Laws 1939, c. 60, § 2, p. 262;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 50-502;

R.S.1943, § 50-404;

Laws 1949, c. 168, § 2, p. 445;

Laws 1973, LB 485, § 4.